Hawaii statutes.
§286-304 Procedure. (a) All
information required by section 286-303 shall be obtained by employees of the
examiner of drivers as provided for by rules of the director and by individual
interviews with the applicant for the identification card or parent, individual
in loco parentis, or guardian, as shown by letters of guardianship. Every
applicant or individual providing information on behalf of any applicant under part
VI and this part shall answer truthfully all questions, furnish all information
within the possession or knowledge of the individual that may be asked or
required by the employee within the scope of the requirements of this part, and
submit to the examiner of drivers all information and supporting documentation
required by rules of the director.

(b) Special provisions may be made by rules
adopted by the director.

(c) The examiner of drivers may require an
applicant, or any individual providing information on behalf of an applicant,
to furnish original or certified copies of documents to establish or
corroborate the information required to establish identity under this part and
may, by rules, set forth what documents will be required to support or
corroborate certain information.

(d) For a person who qualifies as homeless
pursuant to section 346-361, the examiner of drivers shall accept a signed
sworn statement from a member of a victim services organization, an attorney, a
member of the clergy, correctional institution staff, a medical or other health
professional from whom the person has sought services, or a verification letter
from a homeless service provider as documentary evidence of the person's
address. [L 2012, c 310, pt of §2; am L 2015, c 243, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next